Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 13, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024, as amended by Section 6, Chapter 187, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S.
Supp. 2025, Section 20M), is amended to read as follows:
Section 20M. A. Upon the effective date of this act On or
after January 1, 2026, Class C2 shall include the following criminal
offenses:
1. Theft of anhydrous equipment, as provided for in subsection
B of Section 11-10 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Branding, misbranding, marking, or mismarking any domestic
animal with intent to defraud, as provided for in Section 268 of
Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

3. Injuring, destroying, or attempting to injure or destroy any
pipeline transportation system, as provided for in subsection C of
Section 6.1 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. Embezzlement by a county treasurer or other officer, as
provided for in Section 641 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. Giving or offering any bribe to an executive officer, as
provided for in Section 265 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
6. Receiving or agreeing to receive a bribe by an executive
officer or person elected or appointed to an executive office, as
provided for in Section 266 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
7. Entry into a restricted area of a building or grounds using
or carrying a deadly or dangerous weapon or firearm or engaging in
acts of violence that result in great bodily injury, as provided for
in paragraph 1 of subsection B of Section 282 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
8. Forcefully or fraudulently preventing the Legislature from
meeting or organizing, as provided for in Section 301 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
9. Forcefully or fraudulently compelling or attempting to
compel the Legislature to adjourn or disperse, as provided for in
Section 303 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
10. Compelling or attempting to compel either house of the
Legislature to pass, amend, or reject any bill or resolution, grant
or refuse any petition, or to perform or omit to perform any other
official act, as provided for in Section 305 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
11. Offering to give a bribe to any member of the Legislature
in order to influence the member in giving or withholding a vote, as
provided for in Section 308 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 2

12. Asking, receiving, or agreeing to receive any bribe by a
member of the Legislature, as provided for in Section 309 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
13. Entering a fort, magazine, arsenal, armory, arsenal yard,
or encampment and seizing or taking away arms, ammunition, military
stores, or supplies belonging to the state, as provided for in
Section 350 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
14. Carrying, causing to be carried, or publicly displaying any
red flag or other emblem or banner indicating disloyalty to the
Government government of the United States, as provided for in
Section 374 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
15. Bribery by a fiduciary, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 380 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
16. Bribery of a fiduciary, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 380 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
17. Commercial bribery of an insured depository institution or
credit union, as provided in Section 380.1 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
18. Accepting or requesting a bribe by public officers or
employees of this state, as provided for in Section 382 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
19. Offering or giving a bribe to any judicial officer, as
provided for in Section 383 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
20. Attempting to influence a juror, as provided for in Section
388 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
21. Conspiracy to commit a felony, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 421 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
22. Conspiring to commit any act against the peace of the state
by two or more persons outside of the state, as provided for in
Section 422 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 3

23. Conspiring to commit any act against the state by two or
more persons, as provided for in Section 424 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
24. Attempting to avoid a roadblock by failing to stop, passing
by or through such roadblock without permission, as provided for in
Section 540B of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
25. Fraudulently producing an infant in order to intercept the
inheritance or distribution of any personal estate or real estate,
as provided for in Section 578 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
26. Maiming by inflicting upon one’s self oneself any disabling
injury to escape any legal duty, as provided for in Section 752 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
27. Financial exploitation of an elderly or disabled adult with
funds, assets, or property valued at One Hundred Thousand Dollars
($100,000.00) or less, as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection
B of Section 843.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
28. Conducting gambling games, as provided for in Section 941
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
29. Using a house, room, or place to conduct gambling games, as
provided for in Section 946 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
30. Engaging or participating in illegal gambling games by a
public officer, as provided for in Section 948 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
31. Commercial gambling, as provided for in Section 982 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
32. Letting premises for the purpose of betting on races or
receiving, registering, recording, or forwarding any money or thing
of value to a racetrack for betting purposes, as provided for in
paragraphs 2 through 6 of subsection A of Section 991 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 4

33. Using the terms term “prize” or “gift” in a manner that is
untrue or misleading, as provided for in Section 996.3 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
34. Advocating criminal syndicalism, sabotage, or the
necessity, propriety, or expediency of doing any act of physical
violence or unlawful act as a means of accomplishing any industrial
or political ends, change, or revolution, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 1327 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
35. Arson in the fourth degree by attempting to set fire to or
burn any building or property, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1404 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
36. Delivering to another any merchandise for which any bill of
lading, receipt, or voucher has been issued and the value of the
property is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as
provided for in paragraph 4 of Section 1416 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
37. Burglary in the second degree by breaking and entering into
any commercial building or by breaking and entering into a coin-
operated or vending machine, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1435 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
38. Embezzlement of property valued at Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection B
of Section 1451 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
39. Embezzlement by a county or state officer, as provided for
in subsection C of Section 1451 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
40. False personation of another, as provided for in Section
1531 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
41. Receiving money or property intended for another with a
value of Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided
for in paragraph 4 of Section 1532 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 5

42. Use of a motor vehicle or motor-driven cycle for the
purpose of falsely impersonating a law enforcement officer which
causes another person to be injured, defrauded, harassed, vexed, or
annoyed, as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection F of Section
1533 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
43. Obtaining, attempting to obtain, or presenting to a
financial institution personal, financial, or other information of
another person, as provided for in Section 1533.2 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
44. Obtaining property by trick, deception, or by means of a
false or bogus check and the property value is Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in paragraph 3 of
subsection A of Section 1541.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
45. Making, drawing, uttering, or delivering two or more false
or bogus checks and the value is Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in paragraph 3 of subsection A
of Section 1541.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
46. Selling, exchanging, or delivering any forged or
counterfeited promissory note, check, bill, draft, or other evidence
of debt knowing the same is forged or counterfeited and the value of
the instrument is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as
provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 1577 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
47. Possession of any forged, altered, or counterfeited
negotiable note, bill, draft, or other evidence of debt and the
value of the instrument is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or
more, as provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 1578
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
48. Possession of any forged or counterfeited instrument with
intent to injure or defraud and the value of the instrument is
Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in
paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 1579 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 6

49. Uttering or publishing as true any forged, altered, or
counterfeited instrument or counterfeit coins and the value of the
instrument is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as
provided for in paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 1592 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
50. Exhibiting false, forged, or altered books, papers,
vouchers, security, or other instruments of evidence to any public
officer or board with intent to deceive, as provided for in Section
1632 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
51. Destroying, altering, mutilating, or falsifying any books,
papers, writing, or securities belonging to a corporation or
association with intent to defraud, as provided for in Section 1635
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
52. Larceny of lost property and the value of the property is
Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in
paragraph 4 of Section 1702 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
53. Grand larceny and the value of the property is Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in paragraph
4 of subsection A of Section 1705 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
54. Grand larceny in any dwelling house or vessel, as provided
for in Section 1707 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
55. Larceny of any evidence of debt or other written
instrument, as provided for in Section 1709 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
56. Buying or receiving any property that has been stolen,
embezzled, or obtained by false pretense or robbery and has a value
of Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in
paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section 1713 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
57. Buying or receiving any construction equipment or farm
equipment that has been stolen, embezzled, or obtained by false
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 7

pretense or robbery, as provided for in Section 1713.1 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
58. Bringing into this state the stolen property of another
obtained from another state or country, as provided for in Section
1715 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
59. Larceny of livestock or implement of husbandry, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 1716 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
60. Larceny of a dog, as provided for in Section 1718 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
61. Grand larceny of exotic livestock, as provided for in
Section 1719.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
62. Larceny of an aircraft, automobile, construction equipment,
or farm equipment, valued at Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) or
more, as provided for in Section 1720 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
63. Tapping or drilling into a pipeline, as provided for in
Section 1721 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
64. Taking any crude oil or gasoline from any pipe, pipeline,
tank, tank car, or other receptacle or container and the value of
such product is One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as
provided for in paragraph 2 of Section 1722 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
65. Larceny of merchandise from a retailer or wholesaler and
the value of the goods is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or
more, as provided for in paragraph 5 of subsection A of Section 1731
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
66. Larceny of trade secrets that is valued at Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section 1732 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
67. Procuring, soliciting, selling, or receiving by fraudulent,
deceptive, or false means two to ten telephone records without
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 8

authorization, as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection B of
Section 1742.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
68. Masking, altering, or removing any locomotive or railway
car lights or signals, as provided for in Section 1778 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
69. Mutilating, tearing, defacing, obliterating, or destroying
any written instrument, value of Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section 1779 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
70. Violations of the Oklahoma Computer Crimes Act, as provided
for in paragraphs 1, 2, 3, 6, 7, 9, or 10 of subsection A of Section
1953 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
71. Entering with intent to steal copper, or any item that is
known or reasonably should be known as ordinarily used by, belonging
to, or identified with markings indicating ownership by a telephone,
telegraph, Internet, broadcast, or wireless communication company
that results in damages of One Hundred Thousand Dollars
($100,000.00) or more, as provided for in subsection B of Section
1727 of this title;
71. 72. Contracting the sale of rights arising from a criminal
act without providing for the forfeiture of the proceeds, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 17 of Title 22 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
72. 73. Violating any of the provisions of the Oklahoma Clean
Air Act knowing that the violation places others in danger of death
or serious bodily injury, as provided for in subsection B of Section
2-5-116 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
73. 74. Violating any of the provisions of the Oklahoma
Pollutant Discharge Elimination System Act knowing that the
violation places others in imminent danger of death or serious
bodily injury, as provided for in subparagraph a of paragraph 3 of
subsection G of Section 2-6-206 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 9

74. 75. Soliciting or accepting any bribe or money by a game
warden in connection with the performance of his or her duties as a
game warden, as provided for in subsection E of Section 3-201 of
Title 29 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
75. 76. Taking or enticing away an incapacitated or partially
incapacitated person or person for whom a guardian has been
appointed without consent of the guardian, as provided for in
Section 4-904 of Title 30 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
76. 77. Violating any of the provisions of the Viatical
Settlements Act of 2008 if the value of the viatical settlement
contract is more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00)
but not more than Thirty-five Thousand Dollars ($35,000.00), as
provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection F of Section 4055.14 of
Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
77. 78. Embezzlement of certain funds held in trust, value of
Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, as provided for in
paragraph (2) subsection B of Section 153 of Title 42 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
78. 79. Providing any false statement of a material fact in an
application for a certificate of title, as provided for in Section
4-108 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
79. 80. Altering or forging any certificate of title issued by
the Oklahoma Tax Commission, as provided for in Section 4-109 of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
80. Perjury by making any false affidavit, as provided for in
Section 6-302 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
81. Creating, manufacturing, issuing, or selling security
verification forms, as provided for in subsection B of Section 7-612
of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
82. Committing a subsequent violation of driving under the
influence of alcohol or other intoxicating substance within ten (10)
years of being convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol
or other intoxicating substance, causing a personal injury accident
while driving under the influence of alcohol or other intoxicating
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 10

substance, or driving under the influence of alcohol or other
intoxicating substance while transporting a child, as provided for
in paragraph 2 of subsection C of Section 11-902 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
83. Operating a vehicle without a valid driver license for the
class of vehicle being operated and causing an accident resulting in
great bodily injury to another person, as provided for in subsection
B of Section 11-905 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
84. Operating a crusher without a proper license and receiving,
obtaining, or possessing any vehicle or property known to be stolen,
as provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection B of Section 592.9 of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
85. Selling a vehicle or other property to a crusher using
false or altered identification or making a false declaration of
ownership or lien status, as provided for in paragraph 3 of
subsection B of Section 592.9 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
86. Owning, operating, or conducting a chop shop, transporting
any motor vehicle or parts to or from a chop shop, or selling,
transferring, purchasing, or receiving any motor vehicle or parts to
or from a chop shop, as provided for in subsection A of Section 1503
of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
87. Altering, counterfeiting, defacing, destroying, disguising,
falsifying, forging, obliterating, or knowingly removing a vehicle
identification number, as provided for in subsection B of Section
1503 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
88. Perjury by a public officer or employee who states as true
any material matter knowing it to be false, as provided for in
Section 36.5 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
89. Advocating by teaching, justifying, or becoming a member of
or affiliated with the Communist Party or with any other party or
organization that advocates for the revolution, sedition, treason,
or overthrow of the government of the United States or the State of
Oklahoma by a public officer or employee, as provided for in Section
36.6 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 11

90. Perjury by verifying under oath any report, map, or drawing
required to be filed with the Corporation Commission knowing that
such material is false, as provided for in Section 109 of Title 52
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
91. Asking, receiving, or agreeing to receive any gift or
gratuity by any member of the Corporation Commission, as provided
for in Section 118 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
92. Burglary in the first degree by a bail enforcer by breaking
into and entering the dwelling house of any defendant or third party
for purposes of recovery or attempted recovery of a defendant, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 1350.6 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
93. Distributing, dispensing, transporting, or possessing a
controlled dangerous substance or soliciting a person less than
eighteen (18) years of age to cultivate, distribute, or dispense a
controlled dangerous substance, as provided for in paragraph 1 of
subsection A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
94. Creating, distributing, transporting, or possessing a
counterfeit controlled dangerous substance, as provided for in
paragraph 2 of subsection A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
95. Manufacturing or distributing a controlled substance or
synthetic controlled substance, as provided for in paragraph 1 of
subsection C of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
96. Larceny, burglary, or theft of a controlled dangerous
substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-403 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
97. Obtaining or attempting to obtain any controlled dangerous
substance by fraud, deceit, misrepresentation, or subterfuge, as
provided for in paragraph 1 of subsection A of Section 2-407 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
98. Obtaining or attempting to obtain any controlled dangerous
substance by forgery of, alteration of, or changing any information
on a prescription or any written order, as provided for in paragraph
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 12

2 of subsection A of Section 2-407 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
99. Obtaining or attempting to obtain any controlled dangerous
substance by the concealment of a material fact, as provided for in
paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section 2-407 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
100. Obtaining or attempting to obtain any controlled dangerous
substance by the use of a false name or false address, as provided
for in paragraph 4 of subsection A of Section 2-407 of Title 63 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
101. Obtaining or attempting to obtain any controlled dangerous
substance by failing to disclose the receipt or prescription of a
controlled dangerous substance of the same or similar therapeutic
use from another practitioner, as provided for in paragraph 5 of
subsection A of Section 2-407 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
102. Manufacturing, creating, delivering, or possessing an
original prescription form or counterfeit prescription form, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 2-407 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
103. Receiving or acquiring proceeds known to be derived from
any violation of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 2-503.1 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
104. Knowingly or intentionally giving, selling, transferring,
trading, investing, concealing, transporting, or maintaining an
interest in anything of value which is intended to be used for
committing a violation of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous
Substances Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section 2-503.1
of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
105. Directing, planning, organizing, initiating, financing,
managing, supervising, or facilitating the transportation or
transfer of proceeds known to be derived from a violation of the
Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 2-503.1 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 13

106. Conducting a financial transaction involving proceeds
derived from a violation of the Uniform Controlled Dangerous
Substances Act for the purpose of concealing or disguising the
nature, location, source, ownership, or control of the proceeds
known to be derived from a violation of the Uniform Controlled
Dangerous Substances Act, as provided for in subsection D of Section
2-503.1 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
107. Encouraging, facilitating, or allowing access to any money
transmitter equipment for unlawful purposes, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 2-503.1d of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
108. Using a money services business or electronic funds
transfer network to facilitate any violation of the Uniform
Controlled Dangerous Substances Act, as provided for in Section 2-
503.1e of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
109. Structuring, assisting, or attempting to structure any
unlawful transaction with one or more financial or nonfinancial
trades or businesses, as provided for in Section 2-503.1g of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
110. Using explosive agent to kill, injure, or intimidate or to
damage property, as provided for in subsection B of Section 124.8 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
111. Altering, counterfeiting, defacing, destroying,
disguising, falsifying, forging, obliterating, or removing a hull
identification number of a vessel or motor, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 4253 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
111. Commit or attempt
112. Committing or attempting to commit certain violations of
the Vessel and Motor Chop Shop, Stolen and Altered Property Act, as
provided for in subsection D of Section 4253 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
112. 113. Giving a false or bogus check in payment or
remittance of taxes, fees, penalties, or interest levied pursuant to
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 14

any state tax laws and the value of the false or bogus check is Five
Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or more, as provided for in Section 218.1
of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
113. 114. Perjury by providing false answers to any questions
from the Oklahoma Tax Commission or making or presenting any false
affidavit to be filed with the Oklahoma Tax Commission, as provided
for in Section 244 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
114. 115. Perjury by verifying by oath, affirmation, or
declaration, any false report or false return that is to be filed
with the Oklahoma Tax Commission, as provided for in Section 246 of
Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
115. 116. Making or manufacturing any tax stamp or falsely or
fraudulently forging, counterfeiting, reproducing, or possessing any
tax stamp, as provided for in subsection (a) A of Section 317 of
Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
116. 117. Offering or selling unregistered securities, as
provided for in Section 1-301 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
117. 118. Issuing investment certificates when insolvent by an
investment certificate issuer, as provided for in paragraph 1 of
subsection K of Section 1-308 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
118. 119. Transacting business as a broker-dealer without being
registered as a broker-dealer, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1-401 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
119. 120. Employing or associating with an individual for
security transaction purposes when the registration of the
individual is suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from
employment or association with a broker-dealer, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1-401 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
120. 121. Transacting business as an agent without being
registered as an agent, as provided for in subsection A of Section
1-402 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
121. 122. Employing or associating with an agent who transacts
business on behalf of broker-dealers when the agent is not
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 15

registered, as provided for in subsection D of Section 1-402 of
Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
122. 123. Conducting business on behalf of a broker-dealer when
the registration of the agent is suspended or revoked or the
individual is barred from employment or association with a broker-
dealer, as provided for in subsection F of Section 1-402 of Title 71
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
123. 124. Transacting business as an investment adviser without
being registered as an investment adviser, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 1-403 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
124. 125. Employing or associating with an individual to engage
in providing investment advice when the registration of the
individual is suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from
employment or association with an investment adviser, as provided
for in subsection C of Section 1-403 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
125. 126. Employing or associating with an individual required
to be registered as an investment adviser representative who is not
registered as an investment adviser representative, as provided for
in subsection D of Section 1-403 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
126. 127. Transacting business as an investment adviser
representative without being registered as an investment adviser
representative, as provided for in subsection A of Section 1-404 of
Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
127. 128. Conducting business on behalf of an investment
adviser or federal-covered federal covered investment adviser when
the registration of the investment adviser representative is
suspended or revoked or the individual is barred from employment or
association with an investment adviser or federal-covered federal
covered investment adviser, as provided for in subsection E of
Section 1-404 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
128. 129. Employing a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud
another when offering, selling, or purchasing a security, as
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 16

provided for in paragraph 1 of Section 1-501 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
129. 130. Making an untrue statement of a material fact or
omitting a material fact when offering, selling, or purchasing a
security, as provided for in paragraph 2 of Section 1-501 of Title
71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
130. 131. Engaging in an act, practice, or course of business
that operates as a fraud or deceit upon another person when
offering, selling, or purchasing a security, as provided for in
paragraph 3 of Section 1-501 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
131. 132. Employing a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud
another when advising others for compensation as to the value of
securities, as provided for in paragraph 1 of subsection A of
Section 1-502 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
132. 133. Making an untrue statement of a material fact or
omitting a material fact when advising others for compensation as to
the value of securities, as provided for in paragraph 2 of
subsection A of Section 1-502 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
133. 134. Engaging in an act, practice, or course of business
that operates as a fraud or deceit upon another person when advising
others for compensation as to the value of securities, as provided
for in paragraph 3 of subsection A of Section 1-502 of Title 71 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
134. 135. Making false or misleading statements in a record, as
provided for in Section 1-505 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
135. 136. Making or causing to be made to a purchaser,
customer, client, or prospective customer or client, an inconsistent
representation, as provided for in Section 1-506 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
136. 137. Willfully violating certain provisions of the
Oklahoma Uniform Securities Act of 2004, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 1-508 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 17

137. 138. Offering or selling any business opportunity without
being registered under the Oklahoma Business Opportunity Sales Act,
as provided for in Section 806 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
138. 139. Offering or selling any business opportunity without
a written disclosure being filed, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 808 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
139. 140. Offering or selling any business opportunity without
a business opportunity contract or agreement, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 809 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
140. 141. Making or using any specific representations from the
Oklahoma Business Opportunity Sales Act without having a minimum net
worth of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), as provided for in
Section 811 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
141. 142. Using information filed with or obtained by the
Administrator of the Oklahoma Department of Securities that is not
public for the personal benefit of the Administrator or any officers
or employees of the Administrator, as provided for in subsection B
of Section 812 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
142. 143. Employing any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud
in connection with offering or selling any business opportunity, as
provided for in paragraph 1 of Section 819 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
143. 144. Making any untrue statement of a material fact or
omitting a material fact in connection with offering or selling any
business opportunity, as provided for in paragraph 2 of Section 819
of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
144. 145. Engaging in any act, practice, or course of business
which operates as a fraud or deceit in connection with offering or
selling any business opportunity, as provided for in paragraph 3 of
Section 819 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
145. 146. Making or causing to be made any false or misleading
statements or omitting to state a material fact necessary in any
document filed with the Administrator of the Oklahoma Department of
Securities or in any proceeding pursuant to the Oklahoma Business
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 18

Opportunity Sales Act, as provided for in Section 820 of Title 71 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
146. 147. Filing any application for registration that is
false, incomplete, or misleading, as provided for in Section 821 of
Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
147. 148. Publishing, circulating, or using any advertising
that contains untrue statements of material facts or omits to state
material facts necessary, as provided for in Section 822 of Title 71
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
148. 149. Taking or receiving any rebate, percentage of
contract, money, or any other thing of value by an officer of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services from any person, firm,
or corporation, as provided for in Section 71 of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
149. 150. Monopolizing, attempting to monopolize, or conspiring
to monopolize any part of trade or commerce, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 203 of Title 79 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
150. 151. Discrimination in price between different purchasers
of commodities by any person engaged in commerce, as provided for in
Section 204 of Title 79 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
151. 152. Violation of the Oklahoma Antitrust Reform Act, as
provided for in Section 206 of Title 79 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
and
152. 153. Having any interest, directly or indirectly, in any
contract for the purchase of property or construction of work by or
for the Grand River Dam Authority by a director, officer, agent, or
employee, as provided for in Section 867 of Title 82 of the Oklahoma
Statutes; and
153. Using explosive agent to kill, injure, or intimidate or to
damage property, as provided for in subsection B of Section 124.8 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of a Class C2 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished by imprisonment in the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 19

custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not more than
seven (7) years and shall serve at least twenty percent (20%) of the
sentence imposed before release from custody including release to
electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
C. 1. Every person who, having been previously convicted of
one or two Class C or Class D criminal offenses, commits a Class C2
criminal offense shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment
in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not
less than two (2) years nor more than ten (10) years and shall serve
at least twenty percent (20%) of the sentence imposed before release
from custody including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to
Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
2. Every person who, having been previously convicted of three
Class C or Class D criminal offenses, or one or more Class Y, Class
A, or Class B criminal offenses, commits a Class C2 criminal offense
shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment in the custody
of the Department of Corrections for a term of not less than two (2)
years nor more than twelve (12) years and shall serve at least forty
percent (40%) of the sentence imposed before release from custody
including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9
of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
D. Unless specifically exempted pursuant to subsection E of
this section, Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this
title shall not apply to Class C2 criminal offenses.
E. 1. The criminal offenses listed in paragraphs 1, 2, 52, 53,
54, 55, 63, 65, 67, 68, 76, and 77 of subsection A of this section
shall be exempt from the penalty provisions provided for in
subsections B and C of this section. Persons convicted of the
criminal offenses provided for in paragraphs 1, 2, 52, 53, 54, 55,
63, 65, 67, 68, 76, and 77 of subsection A of this section shall be
punished in accordance with the corresponding penalties provided for
in the Oklahoma Statutes including Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title.
2. The criminal offense listed in paragraph 64 of subsection A
of this section shall be exempt from the penalty provision provided
for in subsection B of this section. Persons convicted of the
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 20

criminal offense provided for in paragraph 64 of subsection A of
this section shall be punished in accordance with the corresponding
penalties as provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes including Section
51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title. The
provisions of subsection C of this section still applies apply to
the criminal offense listed in paragraph 64 of subsection A of this
section.
F. All Class C2 criminal offenses shall be punishable by the
corresponding fines as provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1727, as
amended by Section 455, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1727), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1727. A. Any person who shall enter upon enters any
premises, easement, or right-of-way with intent to steal or remove
without the consent of the owner, or with intent to aid or assist in
stealing or removing without the consent of the owner, any copper
wire, copper cable, or copper tubing from and off of any
appurtenance, or any item that is known or reasonably should be
known as ordinarily used by, belonging to, or identified with
markings indicating ownership by a telephone, telegraph, Internet,
broadcast, or wireless communication company on such premises,
easement, or right-of-way shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a
Class D1 felony offense and upon conviction shall be punished
punishable by confinement imprisonment as provided for in
subsections B through F E of Section 20N of this title, or shall be
fined by a fine not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more
than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by both such fine
imprisonment and imprisonment fine.
B. Any person who enters any premises, easement, or right-of-
way with intent to steal or remove without the consent of the owner,
or with intent to aid or assist in stealing or removing without the
consent of the owner, any copper wire, copper cable, or copper
tubing from and off of any appurtenance, or any item that is known
or reasonably should be known as ordinarily used by, belonging to,
or identified with markings indicating ownership by a telephone,
telegraph, Internet, broadcast, or wireless communication company on
such premises, easement, or right-of-way resulting in damages to the
appurtenance, premises, easement, or right-of-way of One Hundred
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 21

Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) or more shall, upon conviction, be
guilty of a Class C2 felony offense punishable by imprisonment as
provided for in subsections B through E of Section 20M of this
title, or by a fine not to exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars
($50,000.00), or by both such imprisonment and fine.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 22

Passed the Senate the 23rd day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1232 Page 23